zh-CN: 轮子材料: PVC; 塑料; 聚氨酯 (PU); 橡胶; 聚氨酯混合物; 其他
el: Υλικό τροχού: PVC; Πλαστικό; Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Καουτσούκ; Υβριδική ουρεθάνη; Άλλο
sl-SI: Material kolesa: PVC; Plastika; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Hibridni uretan; Drugo
en: Wheel material: PVC; Plastic; Polyurethane (PU); Rubber; Urethane hybrid; Other
da: Hjulmateriale: PVC; Plastik; Polyurethan (PU); Gummi; Urethanhybrid; Andet
ru: Материал колеса: ПВХ; Пластик; Полиуретан (ПУ); Резина; Уретановый гибрид; Другое
cs: Materiál koleček: PVC; Plast; Polyuretan (PU); Guma; Uretanový hybrid; Jiný
pt-BR: Roda material: PVC; Plástico; Poliuretano (PU); Borracha; Híbrido de uretano; Outro
pt-PT: Material da roda: PVC; Plástico; Poliuretano (PU); Borracha; Híbrido de uretano; Outro
zh-TW: 輪子材質: PVC; 塑膠; 聚氨酯 (PU); 橡膠; 混合聚氨酯; 其他
ro-RO: Materialul roții: PVC; Plastic; Poliuretan (PU); Cauciuc; Hibrid din uretan; Altele
sk-SK: Materiál kolies: PVC; Plast; Polyuretán (PU); Guma; Uretánový hybrid; Iné
de: Radmaterial: PVC; Kunststoff; Polyurethan (PU); Gummi; Urethan-Hybrid; Andere
fr: Matériau des roues: PVC; Plastique; Polyuréthane (PU); Caoutchouc; Uréthane hybride; Autre
tr: Tekerlek malzemesi: PVC; Plastik; Poliüretan (PU); Kauçuk; Üretan hibrit; Diğer
vi: Vật liệu bánh xe: PVC; Nhựa; Polyurethane (PU); Cao su; Urethane lai; Khác
hu: Kerék anyaga: PVC; Műanyag; Poliuretán (PU); Gumi; Uretán hibrid; Egyéb
bg-BG: Материал на колелото: PVC; Пластмаса; Полиуретан (PU); Гума; Уретанов хибрид; Друго
it: Materiale delle ruote: PVC; Plastica; Poliuretano (PU); Gomma; Ibrido in uretano; Altro
es: Material de la rueda: PVC; Plástico; Poliuretano (PU); Caucho; Híbrido de uretano; Otro
sv: Hjulmaterial: PVC; Plast; Polyuretan (PU); Gummi; Uretanhybrid; Övrigt
fi: Pyörän materiaali: PVC; Muovi; Polyuretaani (PU); Kumi; Uretaanihybridi; Muu
nb: Hjulmateriale: PVC; Plast; Polyuretan (PU); Gummi; Uretanhybrid; Annet
th: วัสดุล้อ: PVC; พลาสติก; โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); ยาง; ยูรีเทนไฮบริด; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Ratų medžiaga: PVC; Plastikas; Poliuretanas (PU); Guma; Uretano hibridas; Kita
nl: Wiel materiaal: PVC; Kunststof; Polyurethaan (PU); Rubber; Urethaan hybride; Overig
hr-HR: Materijal kotača: PVC; Plastika; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Hibridni uretan; Ostalo
ja: ホイール素材: PVC; プラスチック; ポリウレタン (PU); ラバー; ウレタンハイブリッド; その他
pl: Materiał kół: PVC; Plastik; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Uretan hybrydowy; Inne
ko: 휠 소재: PVC; 플라스틱; 폴리우레탄(PU); 고무; 우레탄 하이브리드; 기타